Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2813
Deliver or delivery, defined.

Deliver or delivery means to actually, constructively, or attempt to transfer a drug or device from one person to another, whether or not for consideration.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 909.